test/src/morphology/A-pieni_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: linnrun analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - pieni - ei tsekattu : # Noun 'år' - ei tsekattu
     pieni+A+Sg+Nom: pieni
     pieni+A+Sg+Gen: pienen
     pieni+A+Sg+Par: pientä
     pieni+A+Sg+Tra: pieneksi
     pieni+A+Sg+Abe: pienettä
     pieni+A+Sg+Ine: pienessä
     pieni+A+Sg+Ela: pienestä
     pieni+A+Sg+Ill: pienheen
     pieni+A+Sg+Ade: pienelä
     pieni+A+Sg+Abl: pieneltä
     pieni+A+Sg+All: pienele
     pieni+A+Sg+Ess: pienenä
     pieni+A+Pl+Nom: pienet
     pieni+A+Pl+Gen: pieniin
     pieni+A+Pl+Par: piennii
     pieni+A+Pl+Tra: pieniksi
     pieni+A+Pl+Abe: pienittä
     pieni+A+Pl+Ine: pienissä
     pieni+A+Pl+Ela: pienistä
     pieni+A+Pl+Ill: pienhiin
     pieni+A+Pl+Ade: pienilä
     pieni+A+Pl+Abl: pieniltä
     pieni+A+Pl+All: pienile
     pieni+A+Pl+Ess: pieninä
     pieni+A+Pl+Com: pienine
